test/src/gt-norm-yamls/verbDertoNomen_gt-norm.yaml
  Verb - bloaggit: # DeverbalNounsSTRÁFFUT TV (tsieggit> Der/r, stráffut)
    bloaggit+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom: [bloaggim, blåggim]
    bloaggit+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Nom: [bloaggijiddje, blåggijiddje] 
    bloaggit+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Ine: [bloaggijiddjen, blåggijiddjen] 
    bloaggit+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Pl+Ill: [bloaggijiddjijda, blåggijiddjijda]
    bloaggit+V+TV+Der/mus+N+Sg+Nom: [bloaggimus, blåggimus]
    bloaggit+V+TV+Der/r+N+Sg+Nom: [bloaggár, blåggår]
    bloaggit+V+TV+Der/r+N+Sg+Gen: [bloaggára, blåggåra]
    bloaggit+V+TV+Der/r+N+Pl+Acc: [bloaggárijt, blåggårijt]
    bloaggit+V+TV+Der/NomInstr+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Verb - åhttsåt: # DeverbalNounsOADDÁT IV (oaddát)
    gåvvit+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom: gåvvim
    gåvvit+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Ill: gåvvimij
    gåvvit+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Ela: gåvvimijs
    gåvvit+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Nom: gåvvijiddje 
    gåvvit+V+TV+Der/mus+N+Sg+Nom: gåvvimus
    gåvvit+V+TV+Der/mus+N+Sg+Ela: gåvvimusás
    gåvvit+V+TV+Der/mus+N+Pl+Ela: gåvvimusájs
    gåvvit+V+TV+Der/r+N+Sg+Nom: gåvvår
    gåvvit+V+IV+Der/NomInstr+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Verb - goarssut: # DeverbalNounsDULLUT TV/IV (vallit> Der/r, dullut)
    goarssut+V+IV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom: goarssum
    goarssut+V+IV+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Nom: goarssujiddje 
    goarssut+V+IV+Der/mus+N+Sg+Nom: goarssumus
    goarssut+V+IV+Der/r+N+Sg+Nom: []
    goarssut+V+IV+Der/NomInstr+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Verb - goavnnjit: # DeverbalNounsDULLUT TV/IV (vallit> Der/r, dullut)
    goavnnjit+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom: goavnnjim
    goavnnjit+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Nom: goavnnjijiddje 
    goavnnjit+V+TV+Der/mus+N+Sg+Nom: goavnnjimus
    goavnnjit+V+TV+Der/r+N+Sg+Nom: goavnnjár
    goavnnjit+V+TV+Der/r+N+Sg+Com: goavnnjárijn
    goavnnjit+V+TV+Der/r+N+Pl+Ela: goavnnjárijs
    goavnnjit+V+IV+Der/r+N+Sg+Nom: []
    goavnnjit+V+IV+Der/NomInstr+N+Sg+Nom: []
